Maryland, session 2025, HB0204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
36–101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0204*

HOUSE BILL 204
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(jj) (1) “Usable cannabis” means the dried leaves and flowers of the cannabis
plant.
(2) “Usable cannabis” does not include seedlings, seeds, stems, stalks, or
roots of the plant or the weight of any noncannabis ingredients combined with cannabis,
such as ingredients added to prepare a topical administration.
(KK) “WHOLESALER” MEANS AN ENTITY LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE THAT
IS AUTHORIZED BY THE ADMINISTRATION TO ACQUIRE, PURCHASE, STORE,
TRANSPORT, AND DISTRIBUTE CANNABIS OR CANNABIS PRODUCTS BETWEEN OTHER
CANNABIS LICENSEES.
[(kk)] (LL) “Written certification” means a certification that:
(1) is issued by a certifying provider to a qualifying patient with whom the
provider has a bona fide provider–patient relationship;
(2) includes a written statement certifying that, in the certifying provider’s
professional opinion, after having completed an assessment of the patient’s medical history
and current medical condition, the patient has a condition:
(i) that meets the inclusion criteria and does not meet the exclusion
criteria of the certifying provider’s application; and
(ii) for which the potential benefits of the medical use of cannabis
would likely outweigh the health risks for the patient; and
(3) may include a written statement certifying that, in the certifying
provider’s professional opinion, a 30–day supply of medical cannabis would be inadequate
to meet the medical needs of the qualifying patient.
36–401.
(d) The Administration may not issue more than the following number of licenses
per type, including licenses converted under subsection (b)(1)(ii) of this section:
(1) for standard licenses:
(i) 75 grower licenses;
(ii) 100 processor licenses; and
(iii) 300 dispensary licenses;

HOUSE BILL 204 3
(2) for micro licenses:
(i) 100 grower licenses;
(ii) 100 processor licenses; and
(iii) 10 dispensary licenses;
(3) for incubator space licenses, 10 licenses; [and]
(4) for on–site consumption licenses, 50 licenses; AND
(5) FOR WHOLESALER LICENSES, 15 LICENSES.
(e) (1) This subsection applies to all licenses, including licenses converted
under subsection (b)(1)(ii) of this section.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, a person may have an
ownership interest in or control of, including the power to manage and operate:
(i) for standard licenses and micro licenses:
1. one grower licensee;
2. one processor licensee; and
3. not more than four dispensary licensees;
(ii) for incubator space licenses, not more than two licensees; [and]
(iii) for on–site consumption licenses, not more than two licensees;
AND
(IV) FOR WHOLESALER LICENSES, NOT MORE THAN ONE
LICENSEE.
(3) (i) A person who owns or controls an incubator space licensee [or],
an on–site consumption licensee, OR A WHOLESALER LICENSEE may not own or control
any cannabis licensee listed under paragraph (2)(i) of this subsection.
(ii) The Administration shall adopt regulations limiting a person or
fund from acquiring a nonmajority ownership interest in multiple cannabis businesses
beyond the limitations established under this subsection.
(4) The restrictions in paragraph (2) of this subsection do not apply to a
person or an entity who holds an ownership interest only as a passive investor.

HOUSE BILL 204
36–403.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to an applicant applying for a cannabis
license under § 36–404 of this subtitle.
(2) An applicant for a standard license, an incubator space license, [or] an
on–site consumption license, OR A WHOLESALER LICENSE shall pay an application fee of
$5,000.
(3) An applicant for a micro license shall pay an application fee of $1,000.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the Administration
shall establish licensing and renewal fees for all cannabis licenses.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the licensing and
renewal fees established under paragraph (1) of this subsection for [standard] cannabis
licensees may not exceed:
(i) for initial license fees, $50,000; and
(ii) for renewal license fees, the lesser of 10% of the [standard]
cannabis licensee’s annual gross revenue or $50,000.
(3) The Administration shall reduce licensing and renewal fees by at least
50% for social equity licenses, micro licenses, incubator space licenses, WHOLESALER
LICENSES, and on–site consumption licenses.
36–404.
(f) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, if the Administration, in
consultation with the certification agency designated by the Board of Public Works under
§ 14–303(b) of the State Finance and Procurement Article, the Governor’s Office of Small,
Minority, and Women Business Affairs, the General Assembly, and the Office of the
Attorney General, determines that a disparity study demonstrates a strong basis in
evidence of business discrimination against firms owned by minorities and women in the
Maryland cannabis market, the Administration shall issue a second round of licenses,
applying minimum licensing qualifications and employing remedial measures consistent
with constitutional requirements, for not more than:
(i) for standard licenses:
1. 25 grower licenses;
2. 25 processor licenses; and

HOUSE BILL 204 5
3. 120 dispensary licenses;
(ii) for micro licenses:
1. 70 grower licenses; and
2. 70 processor licenses;
(iii) 10 incubator space licenses; [and]
(iv) 15 on–site consumption licenses; AND
(V) 10 WHOLESALER LICENSES.
(2) If the Administration, in consultation with the certification agency
designated by the Board of Public Works under § 14–303(b) of the State Finance and
Procurement Article, the Governor’s Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business
Affairs, the General Assembly, and the Office of the Attorney General, determines that a
lottery system employing remedial measures established in accordance with a disparity
study can be conducted consistent with constitutional requirements, the Administration
shall award licenses under paragraph (1) of this subsection through a lottery process that
employs remedial measures.
(g) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, if the
Administration, in consultation with the certification agency designated by the Board of
Public Works under § 14–303(b) of the State Finance and Procurement Article, the
Governor’s Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs, the General Assembly,
and the Office of the Attorney General, determines that a disparity study does not
demonstrate a strong basis in evidence of business discrimination against firms owned by
minorities and women in the Maryland cannabis market, the Administration shall enter
each applicant that meets the minimum qualifications established by the Administration
into a lottery and issue to the applicants not more than:
(i) for standard licenses:
1. 25 grower licenses;
2. 25 processor licenses; and
3. 120 dispensary licenses;
(ii) for micro licenses:
1. 70 grower licenses; and
2. 70 processor licenses;

HOUSE BILL 204
(iii) 10 incubator space licenses; [and]
(iv) 15 on–site consumption licenses; AND
(V) 10 WHOLESALER LICENSES.
36–412.
(A) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY ISSUE WHOLESALER LICENSES
AUTHORIZING AN ENTITY TO OPERATE A LICENSED PREMISES WHERE CANNABIS OR
CANNABIS PRODUCTS MAY BE STORED SECURELY.
(B) A WHOLESALER MAY:
(1) PURCHASE CANNABIS OR CANNABIS PRODUCTS FROM OTHER
LICENSED OR REGISTERED ENTITIES;
(2) SECURELY STORE CANNABIS OR CANNABIS PRODUCTS
INDEPENDENTLY OR ON BEHALF OF OTHER CANNABIS LICENSEES; AND
(3) TRANSPORT OR DISTRIBUTE CANNABIS OR CANNABIS PRODUCTS
TO OTHER CANNABIS LICENSEES OR TO INDEPENDENT TESTING LABORATORIES.
(C) A WHOLESALER MAY NOT:
(1) CONDUCT ANY ACTIVITY THAT WOULD REQUIRE AN ADDITIONAL
LICENSE UNDER THIS TITLE, INCLUDING GROWING, PROCESSING, DISPENSING, OR
INCUBATING CANNABIS;
(2) TRANSFORM OR REPACKAGE CANNABIS OR CANNABIS PRODUCTS;
(3) PROVIDE CANNABIS OR CANNABIS PRODUCTS DIRECTLY TO
CONSUMERS;
(4) IMPORT CANNABIS INTO THE STATE; OR
(5) EXPORT CANNABIS OUT OF THE STATE.
(D) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION, INCLUDING THE WHOLESALER REQUIREMENTS FOR:
(1) THE SAFE STORAGE OF CANNABIS AND CANNABIS PRODUCTS;

HOUSE BILL 204 7
(2) PRODUCT TESTING AND PACKAGING AND LABELING COMPLIANCE;
AND
(3) ENSURING AN EQUITABLE CANNABIS MARKET IN THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.